California, session 20252026, SB984.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17201.8 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17201.8. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029, Section 224 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified tips, as it read on January 1, 2026, shall apply, except that in subsection (g) thereof the term “secretary” shall be replaced by the term “Franchise Tax Board.” except that Section 224(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to social security number required, shall not apply.(b) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds and declares the following:(A) The specific goal of the deduction provided by this section is to help workers retain more of their earnings.(B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the deduction achieves its goal shall be the number of taxpayers deducting tips from income pursuant to this section, and the average dollar value amount of those amounts deducted from income. (2) (A) The Franchise Tax Board, no later than December 1, 2029, shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers deducting tips from income under this section and the average dollar value of those amounts deducted.(B) The disclosure provisions of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.(c) This section shall remain operative only until December 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.